Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.120

Meal programs—Establishment and operation—Personnel—Agreements.

The directors of any school district may establish, equip and operate meal programs in school buildings for pupils; certificated and classified employees; volunteers; public agencies, political subdivisions, or associations that serve public entities while using school facilities; other local, state, or federal child nutrition programs; and for school or employee functions: PROVIDED, That the expenditures for food supplies shall not exceed the estimated revenues from the sale of meals, federal aid, Indian education fund lunch aid, or other anticipated revenue, including donations, to be received for that purpose: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the directors of any school district may provide for the use of kitchens and lunchrooms or other facilities in school buildings to furnish meals to elderly persons at cost as provided in RCW 28A.623.020: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the directors of any school district may provide for the use of kitchens and lunchrooms or other facilities in school buildings to furnish meals at cost as provided in RCW 28A.623.030 to children who are participating in educational or training or care programs or activities conducted by private, nonprofit organizations and entities and to students who are attending private elementary and secondary schools. Operation for the purposes of this section shall include the employment and discharge for sufficient cause of personnel necessary for preparation of food or supervision of students during lunch periods and fixing their compensation, payable from the district general fund, or entering into agreement with a private agency for the establishment, management and/or operation of a food service program or any part thereof.

[ 2002 c 36 s 1; 1997 c 13 s 4; 1990 c 33 s 247; 1979 ex.s. c 140 s 3; 1979 c 58 s 1; 1973 c 107 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.136. Prior: (i) 1947 c 31 s 1; 1943 c 51 s 1; 1939 c 160 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4706-1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.136, 28.58.260. (ii) 1943 c 51 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4706-2. Formerly RCW 28.58.270.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 140: See note following RCW 28A.225.200.

Severability—1979 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.623.030.

Nonprofit meal program for elderly—Purpose: RCW 28A.623.010.